New York, session 2025-2026, A9180.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the town of Babylon, county of Suffolk is hereby author- 3 ized to accept from Christian Congregation of Long Island, a not-for- 4 profit organization, an application for exemption from real property 5 taxes pursuant to section 420-a of the real property tax law with 6 respect to the 2023-2024 assessment rolls for the parcel conveyed to 7 such organization, with such parcel being located at 890 County Line 8 Road, in the hamlet of Amityville, town of Babylon, county of Suffolk, 9 otherwise known as Suffolk county tax map district 0100, section 163.00, 10 block 01.00, lot 001.000. 11 If accepted, such application shall be reviewed as if it had been 12 received on or before the taxable status date established for such 13 rolls. If satisfied that such nonprofit organization would otherwise be 14 entitled to such exemption if such organization had filed an application 15 for exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon 16 approval by the town of Babylon town board, may grant exemption from all 17 taxation and make appropriate corrections to the subject rolls. If such 18 exemption is granted and such organization therefore shall have paid any 19 tax with respect to the subject rolls, the applicable governing body or 20 tax department may, in its sole discretion, provide for the refund of 21 the taxes paid, along with any fines or penalties paid, and cancel any 22 taxes, fines, penalties, interest, or tax liens remaining unpaid. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13886-02-6